Idaho, session 2025, H0067.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 72-436, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
72-436. BURIAL EXPENSES. If death results from the injury within four
(4) years, the employer shall pay to the person entitled to compensation,
or if there is none then to the personal representative of the deceased em-
ployee, a sum not to exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) for funeral and
burial or cremation, together with the actual expenses of transportation of
the employee's body to his place of residence within the United States or
Canada ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for funeral, burial or cremation, and
transportation expenses.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.